Utah statutes.
73-18-12.   Operation in willful or wanton disregard for safety -- Penalty.

(1)  A person may not operate any nonmotorized vessel, or manipulate any water skis or any device towed by a motorboat in a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 200, 2002 General Session

